Utah statutes.
32B-8a-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Business entity" means a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, sole proprietorship, or similar entity.

(2)  "Transfer fee" means a fee described in Section 32B-8a-303.

(3)  "Transferee" means a person who intends to hold a retail license after the transfer of the retail license if the transfer is approved by the commission under this chapter.

(4)  "Transferor" means a retail licensee who intends to transfer a retail license held by the retail licensee if the transfer is approved by the commission under this chapter.

